Hawaii statutes.
§412:13-222 Relocation of office; written
application necessary. (a) No foreign bank that is licensed to establish
and maintain a Hawaii state branch, Hawaii state agency, or Hawaii
representative office shall relocate any Hawaii office without the commissioner's
prior written approval; provided that approval shall not be required if:

(1) The relocation will be less than one mile from
the foreign bank's present place of business;

(2) The foreign bank gives the commissioner written
notice at least twenty days prior to the move;

(3) The type of business carried on at the new place
of business will be the same as at the present place of business; and

(4) There will be no financial involvement in the
relocation by a director, executive officer, or principal shareholder, or a
related interest of any of these persons.

(b) The foreign bank shall file an application
with the commissioner. The application shall be in a form and contain any
information as the commissioner shall require.

(c) If after appropriate examination and
investigation, the commissioner is satisfied that the proposed relocation is
justified and proper, the commissioner shall approve the application in
writing, with any conditions that the commissioner deems appropriate. [L 1996,
c 155, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 245, §6; am L 2001, c 170, §19; am L 2008, c 196,
§10; am L 2016, c 149, §15]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next